North Carolina, session 2025, SB334.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 2D of Subchapter I of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes is
repealed.
SECTION 2. This act does not affect the rights or liabilities of the State, a taxpayer,
or another person arising under a statute amended or repealed by this act before the effective date
of its amendment or repeal; nor does it affect the right to any refund or credit of a tax that accrued
under the amended or repealed statute before the effective date of its amendment or repeal.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S334-v-1*